Utah statutes.
75-5b-403.   Effect of registration.
(1)  Upon registration of a guardianship or protective order from another
state, the guardian or conservator may exercise in this state all powers
authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of
this state, including maintaining actions and proceedings in this state and,
if the guardian or conservator is not a resident of this state, subject to any
conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.
(2)  A court of this state may grant any relief available under this chapter
and other law of this state to enforce a registered order.
